pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Monitores biométricos > Analisadores de gordura: Paquímetros de gordura corporal; Balanças de gordura corporal
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Biometrijski monitori > Analizatori tjelesne masti: Kaliperi za mjerenje tjelesne masti; Vage za mjerenje tjelesne masti
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Monitoare biometrice > Analizoare pentru grăsimea corporală: Adipometre; Cântare pentru grăsime corporală
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Lettori biometrici > Analizzatori grasso corporeo: Pinze per la misurazione del grasso corporeo; Bilance per l'analisi del grasso corporeo
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医療用測定器 > 体脂肪計: 体脂肪キャリパー; 体脂肪計
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Biometriniai monitoriai > Kūno riebalų analizatoriai: Kūno riebalų kaliperiai; Kūno riebalų svarstyklės
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Biyometrik Monitörler > Vücut Yağ Analiz Cihazları: Vücut Yağ Kalipersleri; Vücut Yağ Ölçerleri
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Medizinische Messgeräte > Körperfettanalyse: Körperfett-Messzangen; Körperfettwaagen
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Biometric Monitors > Body Fat Analyzers: Body Fat Calipers; Body Fat Scales
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Dispositivos de monitorização biométrica > Analisadores de gordura corporal: Adipómetros; Balanças de gordura corporal
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Dispositivos biométricos > Analizadores de grasa corporal: Calibradores de grasa corporal; Básculas de grasa corporal
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Biometrimätare > Kroppsfettanalyserare: Kroppsfettkaliber; Kroppsfettvågar
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Biometrični monitorji > Analizatorji telesne sestave: Kljunasta merila za telesno maščobo; Tehtnice za telesno maščobo
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Βιομετρικές οθόνες > Δείκτες ανάλυσης λίπους σώματος: Παχύμετρα σωματικού λίπους; Ζυγαριές σωματικού λίπους
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Biometriske overvåkningsapparater > Kroppsfettanalysatorer: Kroppsfettkalipere; Kroppsfettprosent vekter
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 生物体征监测器 > 体脂测量仪: 体脂钳; 体脂秤
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Biometrikus figyelők > Testzsír-elemzők: Testzsírmérő körzők; Testzsírmérő mérlegek
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Moniteurs biométriques > Dispositifs d’analyse du tissu adipeux: Pinces à pli cutané; Pèse-personnes impédancemètres
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Biometriske målere > Test af kropsfedt: Kropsfedtmålere; Kropsfedtvægte
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Biometrické monitory > Analyzátory telesného tuku: Kalipre na meranie telesného tuku; Váhy s meraním telesného tuku
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Thiết bị theo dõi sinh trắc học > Thiết bị phân tích mỡ cơ thể: Kẹp đo mỡ cơ thể; Cân đo mỡ cơ thể
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 生物識別監測 > 體脂分析儀: 體脂夾; 體脂計
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Инструменты для измерения биометрических показателей > Определители жировых отложений: Калиперы для измерения жира; Весы-анализаторы жира
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Biometriset monitorit > Kehon rasvapitoisuuden analyysilaitteet: Kehonrasvamittaharppi; Kehonrasvaprosenttivaaka
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Biometrische meters > Apparaten voor lichaamsvetanalyse: Lichaamsvet calipers; Lichaamsvet weegschalen
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Měřiče tělesných funkcí > Analyzátory tělesného tuku: Kaliperové měřiče tuku; Váhy s měřením tuku
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Биометрични монитори > Анализатори на телесни мазнини: Калипери за телесна мазнина; Кантари за телесна мазнина
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > เครื่องตรวจวัดชีวมิติ > อุปกรณ์วิเคราะห์ไขมัน: คีมวัดไขมันใต้ผิวหนัง; เครื่องชั่งวัดไขมัน
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Monitory funkcji życiowych > Urządzenia do pomiaru tkanki tłuszczowej: Suwmiarki do pomiaru tkanki tłuszczowej; Wagi z analizatorem tkanki tłuszczowej
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 생체신호 모니터 > 체지방 분석기: 체지방 캘리퍼; 체지방 측정 저울